Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.320

Salary reduction plan—Eligibility—Participation, withdrawal.

(1) Elected officials and permanent employees and school employees are eligible to participate in the salary reduction plan and reduce their salary by agreement with the authority. The authority may adopt rules to: (a) Limit the participation of employing agencies and their employees in the plan; and (b) permit participation in the plan by temporary employees and school employees.

(2) Persons eligible under subsection (1) of this section may enter into salary reduction agreements with the state.

(3)(a) An eligible person may become a participant of the salary reduction plan for a full plan year with annual benefit plan selection for each new plan year made before the beginning of the plan year, as determined by the authority, or upon becoming eligible.

(b) Once an eligible person elects to participate in the salary reduction plan and determines the amount his or her gross salary shall be reduced and the benefit plan for which the funds are to be used during the plan year, the agreement shall be irrevocable and may not be amended during the plan year except as provided in (c) of this subsection. Prior to making an election to participate in the salary reduction plan, the eligible person shall be informed in writing of all the benefits and reductions that will occur as a result of such election.

(c) The authority shall provide in the salary reduction plan that a participant may enroll, terminate, or change his or her election after the plan year has begun if there is a significant change in a participant's status, as provided by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 and the regulations adopted under that section and defined by the authority.

(4) The authority shall establish as part of the salary reduction plan the procedures for and effect of withdrawal from the plan by reason of retirement, death, leave of absence, or termination of employment. To the extent possible under federal law, the authority shall protect participants from forfeiture of rights under the plan.

(5) Any reduction of salary under the salary reduction plan shall not reduce the reportable compensation for the purpose of computing the state retirement and pension benefits earned by the public employee pursuant to chapters 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, and 43.43 RCW.

[ 2023 c 51 s 17; 2018 c 260 s 20; 2008 c 229 s 5; 2007 c 492 s 6; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 229: See note following RCW 41.05.295.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.